District of Columbia statutes.
6-212

Repealed

Establishment of Authority Advisory Committee.

Repealed.

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 13, 47 DCR 1325
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 254(c), 62 DCR 1884
This section is referenced in § 6-201.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 6-201.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 254(c) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 254(c) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).